Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.135

Severability—1935 c 113.

The several sections and provisions of this chapter, except RCW 7.24.010 and 7.24.020, are hereby declared independent and severable, and the invalidity, if any, of any part or feature thereof shall not affect or render the remainder of the chapter invalid or inoperative.

[ 1935 c 113 s 14; RRS s 784-14.]